Louisiana, session 2026, HB835.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:302.9(H) through (J) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
56:302.9(K) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§302.9. Charter boat fishing guide license; nonresident fee
* * *
H. A charter boat fishing guide licensee performing for-hire fishing guide
activity within a wildlife management area may purchase a Charter Guide WMA
Access Permit. This permit satisfies the wildlife management area access permit
requirements for the charter fishing guide and his clients when engaged in a for-hire
fishing trip within a wildlife management area. The fee for the Charter Guide WMA
Access Permit shall be one hundred dollars. The permit is valid for one year,
beginning on January first of each calendar year and expiring on December
thirty-first of the same calendar year.
I. Each charter boat fishing guide licensee may complete a landing report and
return the report to the department at the time and manner designated by the
commission. The commission shall establish the information to be provided in the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 835 ENROLLED
landing report by the charter boat fishing guide licensee. The landing report may
include information on the number of trips taken, number of anglers fishing on a trip,
area fished, time fished, trip origin, any information determined by the commission
to be necessary to properly manage the fishery resource of the state, and any
information required by the commission to prepare stock assessments. However, the
commission shall not request any financial information. The information provided
by a licensee shall be maintained as confidential in accordance with R.S. 56:301.4.
The commission shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Subsection.
I. Except for Subsection H, a violation of any provision of this Section shall
constitute a class four violation, R.S. 56:34.
J. Penalties.
(1) Except for Subsection I of this Section, a violation of any provision of
this Section shall constitute a class four violation subject to the penalties of R.S.
56:34.
(2) In addition to any other penalty provided for in this Section, for any
person convicted of a first offense of violating Subsection A or B of this Section, the
offender shall pay a fine of no less than one thousand dollars to the Department of
Wildlife and Fisheries. For any person convicted of a second offense of violating
Subsection A or B of this Section, the offender may only operate a vessel that
employs a vessel monitoring system for the three years after the date of the
conviction. For any person convicted of a third or subsequent offense of violating
Subsection A or B of this Section, the offender may only operate a vessel that
employs a vessel monitoring system for ten years after the date of the conviction.
(2) (3) Whenever an offender is required to employ a vessel monitoring
system, access to the monitoring system shall be granted to the department, and the
offender shall notify the department on which vessel or vessels the offender will be
operating for commercial or recreational use. Any person required to be on board
a vessel with an approved vessel monitoring system shall comply with all rules and
regulations promulgated by the department or the commission to ensure compliance
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 835 ENROLLED
with vessel monitoring system requirements. The cost of a vessel monitoring system
shall be the responsibility of the offender. The department shall approve the vessel
monitoring system for use pursuant to this Section.
(3) (4) Any charter guide or individual posing as a charter guide required to
operate a vessel with an approved vessel monitoring system who is found operating
any vessel that is not equipped with such a system, for commercial or recreational
purposes, may have their charter guide license suspended and may be prohibited
from obtaining such a license for the remainder of the year in which the person was
found not abiding by the vessel monitoring requirement. In addition, the violator
shall be sentenced to perform no less than forty hours of community service. If
available, the hours shall be served in a litter abatement community service program.
(4) K. The department shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.